Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.120

Personnel missing in action, interned, or captured construed as "absentee."

Any person serving in or with the armed forces of the United States, in or with the Red Cross, or in or with the merchant marine or otherwise, during any period of time when a state of hostilities exists between the United States and any other power and for one year thereafter, who has been reported or listed as missing in action, or interned in a neutral country, or captured by the enemy, shall be an "absentee" within the meaning of this chapter.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 83 s 2.]